Utah statutes.
53-3-104.   Division duties.
The division shall:
(1)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, make rules:
(a)  for examining applicants for a license, as necessary for the safety and
welfare of the traveling public;
(b)  for acceptable documentation of an applicant's identity, Social Security
number, Utah resident status, Utah residence address, proof of legal presence,
proof of citizenship in the United States, and other proof or documentation
required under this chapter;
(c)  regarding the restrictions to be imposed on a person driving a motor
vehicle with a temporary learner permit or learner permit;
(d)  for exemptions from licensing requirements as authorized in this chapter;
and
(e)  establishing procedures for the storage and maintenance of applicant
information provided in accordance with Section 53-3-205, 53-3-410, or
53-3-804;
(2)  examine each applicant according to the class of license applied for;
(3)  license motor vehicle drivers;
(4)  file every application for a license received by it and shall maintain
indices containing:
(a)  all applications denied and the reason each was denied;
(b)  all applications granted; and
(c)  the name of every licensee whose license has been suspended,
disqualified, or revoked by the division and the reasons for the action;
(5)  suspend, revoke, disqualify, cancel, or deny any license issued in
accordance with this chapter;
(6)  file all accident reports and abstracts of court records of convictions
received by it under state law;
(7)  maintain a record of each licensee showing the licensee's convictions and
the traffic accidents in which the licensee has been involved where a
conviction has resulted;
(8)  consider the record of a licensee upon an application for renewal of a
license and at other appropriate times;
(9)  search the license files, compile, and furnish a report on the driving
record of any person licensed in the state in accordance with Section
53-3-109;
(10)  develop and implement a record system as required by Section 41-6a-604;
(11)  in accordance with Section 53A-13-208, establish:
(a)  procedures and standards to certify teachers of driver education classes
to administer knowledge and skills tests;
(b)  minimal standards for the tests; and
(c)  procedures to enable school districts to administer or process any tests
for students to receive a class D operator's license;
(12)  in accordance with Section 53-3-510, establish:
(a)  procedures and standards to certify licensed instructors of commercial
driver training school courses to administer the skills test;
(b)  minimal standards for the test; and
(c)  procedures to enable licensed commercial driver training schools to
administer or process skills tests for students to receive a class D
operator's license;
(13)  provide administrative support to the Driver License Medical Advisory
Board created in Section 53-3-303; and
(14)  upon request by the lieutenant governor, provide the lieutenant governor
with a digital copy of the driver license or identification card signature of
a person who is an applicant for voter registration under Section 20A-2-206.
